Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.180

Charter schools—Oversight—Corrective action.

(1) Each authorizer must continually monitor the performance and legal compliance of the charter schools under its jurisdiction, including collecting and analyzing data to support ongoing evaluation according to the performance framework in the charter contract.

(2) An authorizer may conduct or require oversight activities that enable the authorizer to fulfill its responsibilities under this chapter, including conducting appropriate inquiries and investigations. Examples of permitted reasons for conducting or requiring oversight activities under this section include, but are not limited to: The persistent unsatisfactory performance of a charter school; a pattern of well-founded complaints about a charter school; the authority to conduct such oversight activities as provided by statute, rule, or charter contract; or other objective circumstances.

(3) In the event that a charter school's performance, financial status, or legal compliance appears unsatisfactory, the authorizer must promptly notify the school of the perceived problem and provide reasonable opportunity for the school to remedy the problem. However, if the problem warrants revocation of the charter contract, the revocation procedures under RCW 28A.710.200 apply.

(4) An authorizer may take appropriate corrective actions or exercise sanctions short of revocation in response to apparent deficiencies in charter school performance or legal compliance. These actions or sanctions may include, if warranted, requiring a school to develop and execute a corrective action plan within a specified time frame.

[ 2023 c 356 s 8; 2016 c 241 s 118. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 218 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 356: See note following RCW 28A.710.030.